test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-aeqbtiji_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - äʼbțiji: # Noun 187 'eng helpful/est abivalmis/fin avulias' - full paradigm
     äʼbțiji+A+Sg+Nom: [äʼbțiji, äbțiji]
     äʼbțiji+A+Sg+Gen: [äʼbțijiz, äbțijiz]
     äʼbțiji+A+Sg+Par: [äʼbțijizt, äbțijizt]
     äʼbțiji+A+Sg+Dat: [äʼbțijizõn, äbțijizõn]
     äʼbțiji+A+Sg+Ins: [äʼbțijizõks, äbțijizõks]
     äʼbțiji+A+Sg+Ill: [äʼbțijizõ, äbțijizõ]
     äʼbțiji+A+Sg+Ela: [äʼbțijizõst, äbțijizõst]
     äʼbțiji+A+Pl+Nom: [äʼbțijid, äbțijid]
     äʼbțiji+A+Pl+Gen: [äʼbțijid, äbțijid]
     äʼbțiji+A+Pl+Par: [äʼbțijidi, äbțijidi]
     äʼbțiji+A+Pl+Dat: [äʼbțijidõn, äbțijidõn]
     äʼbțiji+A+Pl+Ins: [äʼbțijidõks, äbțijidõks]
     äʼbțiji+A+Pl+Ill: [äʼbțijiž, äbțijiž]
     äʼbțiji+A+Pl+Ela: [äʼbțijisti, äbțijisti]
